ja: ハサミの用途: 布/裁縫用; 一般工作/事務用; ギフトラッピング用; キッチン/多目的用; 金属/ホイル用; 紙用; プラスチック用; 学校/教室用; スクラップブッキング/カード作成用; 糸切り/刺繍用; その他
sv: Saxens användningsområde: Tyg/sömnad; Allmänt pyssel/kontor; Presentinslagning; Kök/flerfunktion; Metall/folie; Papper; Plast; Skola/klassrum; Scrapbooking/korttillverkning; Garn/broderisaxar; Övrigt
hr-HR: Aplikacija škara: Tkanina/šivanje; Opće rukotvorine/ured; Zamatanje darova; Kuhinja / višenamjensko; Metal/folija; Papir; Plastika; Škola/učionica; Spomenari / izrada čestitki; Pređa / škarice za vez; Ostalo
en: Scissors application: Fabric/sewing; General craft/office; Gift wrapping; Kitchen/multipurpose; Metal/foil; Paper; Plastic; School/classroom; Scrapbooking/cardmaking; Yarn/embroidery snips; Other
nl: Schaar toepassing: Stof/naaien; Algemeen knutselen/kantoor; Cadeauverpakking; Keuken/multifunctioneel; Metaal/folie; Papier; Plastic; School/klaslokaal; Scrapbooking/kaarten maken; Garen/borduurscharen; Overig
it: Applicazione delle forbici: Tessuto/cucito; Bricolage generico/ufficio; Confezioni regalo; Cucina/multiuso; Metallo/lamina; Carta; Plastica; Scuola/classe; Scrapbooking/creazione di biglietti; Filato/forbicine da ricamo; Altro
th: การใช้งานกรรไกร: ผ้า/การตัดเย็บ; งานฝีมือทั่วไป/สำนักงาน; การห่อของขวัญ; ห้องครัว/อเนกประสงค์; โลหะ/ฟอยล์; กระดาษ; พลาสติก; โรงเรียน/ห้องเรียน; การทำสมุดภาพ/การทำการ์ด; ไหมพรม/กรรไกรขลิบด้าย; อื่นๆ
da: Saksanvendelse: Stof/syning; Generel hobby/kontor; Indpakning af gaver; Køkken/multifunktionel; Metal/folie; Papir; Plastik; Skole/klasseværelse; Scrapbooking/kortfremstilling; Garn/broderisaks; Andet
zh-TW: 剪刀應用: 布料/裁縫; 一般工藝/辦公; 禮物包裝; 廚房/多用途; 金屬/箔; 紙張; 塑膠; 學校/教室; 剪貼簿/卡片製作; 毛線/刺繡剪刀; 其他
ru: Назначение ножниц: Для ткани/шитья; Общее рукоделие/офис; Упаковка подарков; Кухонные/универсальные; Металл/фольга; Бумага; Пластик; Школа/класс; Скрапбукинг/создание открыток; Пряжа/вышивание; Другое
nb: Saksbruk: Stoff/sying; Generell hobby/kontor; Gaveinnpakning; Kjøkken/flerbruk; Metall/folie; Papir; Plast; Skole/klasserom; Skrapbok/kortlaging; Garn-/broderisaks; Annet
bg-BG: Предназначение на ножиците: Тъкани/Шиене; Общи занаяти/Офис; Опаковане на подаръци; За кухня/Многофункционални; Метал/Фолио; Хартия; Пластмаса; Училище/Класна стая; Скрапбукинг/Изработка на картички; Ножици за прежда/бродерия; Други
de: Einsatzbereich der Schere: Stoff/Nähen; Allgemeines Basteln/Büro; Geschenkverpackung; Küche/Mehrzweck; Metall/Folie; Papier; Kunststoff; Schule/Klassenzimmer; Scrapbooking/Kartenbasteln; Garn-/Stickschere; Sonstige
ko: 가위 용도: 원단/재봉; 일반 공예/사무용; 선물 포장; 주방/다용도; 금속/포일; 종이; 플라스틱; 학교/교실용; 스크랩북/카드 만들기; 털실/자수 쪽가위; 기타
sl-SI: Uporaba škarij: Tkanina/šivanje; Splošno ustvarjanje/pisarna; Zavijanje daril; Kuhinja/večnamensko; Kovina/folija; Papir; Plastika; Šola/učilnica; Izdelava albumov in voščilnic; Škarjice za prejo/vezenje; Drugo
el: Εφαρμογή με ψαλίδι: Ύφασμα/ράψιμο; Γενικές χειροτεχνίες/γραφείο; Περιτύλιγμα δώρων; Κουζίνα/πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Μέταλλο/αλουμινόχαρτο; Χαρτί; Πλαστικό; Σχολείο/τάξη; Λεύκωμα/κατασκευή καρτών; Ψαλιδάκι νήματος/κεντήματος; Άλλο
zh-CN: 剪刀用途: 布料/缝纫; 通用工艺/办公; 礼品包装; 厨房/多用途; 金属/金属箔; 纸张; 塑料; 学校/课堂; 剪贴簿/卡片制作; 纱线/刺绣剪刀; 其他
fr: Usage des ciseaux: Tissu/couture; Artisanat général/bureau; Emballage cadeau; Cuisine/polyvalent; Métal/papier d'aluminium; Papier; Plastique; École/salle de classe; Scrapbooking/carterie; Coupe-fil/ciseaux à broder; Autre
pt-BR: Tesoura aplicação: Tecido/costura; Artesanato geral/escritório; Embrulho de presente; Cozinha/multiuso; Metal/alumínio; Papel; Plástico; Escola/sala de aula; Scrapbooking/confecção de cartões; Tesouras para fios/bordado; Outros
ro-RO: Aplicația foarfecelor: Materiale textile/cusut; Artizanat general/birou; Împachetarea cadourilor; Bucătărie/multifuncțional; Metal/folie; Hârtie; Plastic; Școală/sală de clasă; Scrapbooking/creare de felicitări; Fire/foarfece pentru broderie; Altele
lt-LT: Žirklių paskirtis: Audiniams / siuvimui; Bendriesiems rankdarbiams / biurui; Dovanų pakavimui; Virtuvei / daugiafunkcės; Metalui / folijai; Popieriui; Plastikui; Mokyklai / klasei; Skrebinimui / atvirukų gamybai; Siūlams / siuvinėjimui; Kita
vi: Ứng dụng kéo: Vải/may vá; Thủ công chung/văn phòng; Gói quà; Nhà bếp/đa năng; Kim loại/giấy bạc; Giấy; Nhựa; Trường học/lớp học; Sổ lưu niệm/làm thiệp; Cắt len/chỉ thêu; Khác
es: Aplicación de tijeras: Tela/costura; Manualidades en general/oficina; Envoltura de regalos; Cocina/multiusos; Metal/papel aluminio; Papel; Plástico; Escuela/aula; Scrapbooking/creación de tarjetas; Tijeras para hilo/bordado; Otro
hu: Olló felhasználási területe: Szövet/varrás; Általános kézműveskedés/iroda; Ajándékcsomagolás; Konyha/többcélú; Fém/fólia; Papír; Műanyag; Iskola/osztályterem; Scrapbook készítés/képeslapkészítés; Fonal-/hímzőolló; Egyéb
pl: Zastosowanie nożyczek: Tkaniny/szycie; Rękodzieło/biuro; Pakowanie prezentów; Kuchnia/wielofunkcyjne; Metal/folia; Papier; Plastik; Szkoła/sala lekcyjna; Scrapbooking / robienie kartek; Włóczka/obcinaczki do nici; Inne
tr: Makas kullanım amacı: Kumaş/dikiş; Genel el işi/ofis; Hediye paketi; Mutfak/çok amaçlı; Metal/folyo; Kağıt; Plastik; Okul/sınıf; Koleksiyon defteri/kart yapımı; İplik/nakış makası; Diğer
fi: Saksisovellus: Kangas/ompelu; Yleisaskartelu/toimisto; Lahjojen paketointi; Keittiö/monikäyttöinen; Metalli/folio; Paperi; Muovi; Koulu/luokkahuone; Skräppäys/korttiaskartelu; Lanka-/kirjontasakset; Muu
sk-SK: Účel použitia nožníc: Látka/šitie; Všeobecné remeselné/kancelárske; Balenie darčekov; Kuchynské/viacúčelové; Kov/fólia; Papier; Plast; Škola/trieda; Scrapbooking/výroba pohľadníc; Priadza/vyšívacie nožnice; Iné
cs: Nůžky aplikace: Látka/šití; Kancelářské/všeobecné tvoření; Balení dárků; Kuchyňské/víceúčelové; Kov/fólie; Papír; Plast; Škola/třída; Scrapbooking / výroba přání; Příze/vyšívání (odstřihávače); Jiné
pt-PT: Aplicação das tesouras: Tecido/costura; Artesanato geral/escritório; Embrulhos de presentes; Cozinha/multiusos; Metal/folha metálica; Papel; Plástico; Escola/sala de aula; Scrapbooking/criação de postais; Tesoura de remate para fios/bordados; Outro